src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_meridud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - meriduđ: # MLO & Elsa-ákku, tärhistum; väädis!
    meriduđ+V+Inf: meriduđ
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meriduum
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: meriduuh
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meriduvvoo
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: meriduvvoon
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: meriduuvettee
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: meriduvvov
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: meridup
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: meriduuvetteđ
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meriduvvojeh
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: meriduvvim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: meriduvvih
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: meridui
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: meriduim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: meriduid
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: meriduin
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: meriduim
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: meriduid
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: meriduvvojii
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: meriduuččim
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: meriduuččih
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: meriduuččij
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: meriduuččáim
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: meriduuččáid
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: meriduuččáin
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: meriduuččijm
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: meriduuččijd
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: meriduuččii
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: meridužžeem
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: meridužžeeh
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: meriduš                # meriduž
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: meridužžeen
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: meridušvettee           # meridužvettee
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: meridužžuv
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: meridužžep
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: meridušvetteđ           # meridužvetteđ
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: meridužeh

    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: meriduu
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: meriduvvus
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du1: meriduvvoon    
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du2: meriduvvee 
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Du3: meriduvvus     
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: meriduvvop      
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: meriduđ              
    meriduđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: meriduvvus
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: meriduu
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: meriduččii
    meriduđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: meridužžii
    meriduđ+V+PrsPrc: meriduvvee
    meriduđ+V+PrfPrc: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Nom: meridum
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Ess: meriduumin
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Loc: meriduumist
    meriduđ+V+Actio+Ill: meriduumân
    meriduđ+V+Ger: meriduudijn
    meriduđ+V+VAbess: meriduuhánnáá
    
  Verb - teddiluđ: # MLO & Elsa-ákku
    teddiluđ+V+Inf: teddiluđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teddiluum
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddiluvvoo
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: teddiluvvoon
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: teddiluuvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: teddiluvvov
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teddilup
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teddiluvvojeh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: teddiluvvim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teddiluvvih
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teddilui
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: teddiluin
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teddiluvvojii
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: teddiluuččim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuččih
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: teddiluuččij
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: teddiluuččáim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: teddiluuččáid
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: teddiluuččáin
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: teddiluuččijm
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuččijd
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: teddiluuččii
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: teddilužžeem
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: teddilužžeeh
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: teddiluš            # teddiluž
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: teddilužžeen
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: teddilušvettee      # teddilužvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: teddilužžuv
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: teddilužžep
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: teddilušvetteđ      # teddilužvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: teddilužeh

    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: teddiluvvus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du1: teddiluvvoon      
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du2: teddiluvvee          
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du3: teddiluvvus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: teddiluvvop 
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: teddiluđ              
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: teddiluvvus   
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluččii
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: teddilužžii
    teddiluđ+V+PrsPrc: teddiluvvee
    teddiluđ+V+PrfPrc: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Nom: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ess: teddiluumin
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Loc: teddiluumist
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ill: teddiluumân
    teddiluđ+V+Ger: teddiluudijn
    teddiluđ+V+VAbess: teddiluuhánnáá
    
    
    
